Hawaii statutes.
[§431:10E-123] Definitions. As used in
this part, "inquiry" means a telephone call or other communication
made to an insurer regarding the terms, conditions, or coverage afforded under
an insurance policy that does not result in a claim, including questions
concerning whether a policy will cover a loss or the process for filing a
claim. The term shall not constitute a claim for purposes of section 431:13‑103(a)(11).
[L 2012, c 80, pt of §1]

Previous
Vol09_Ch0431-0435H
Next